Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-507
Distribution by State Librarian; section, termination.

The State Librarian or the State Librarian's designee shall issue one copy each of the session laws and journals to the United States District Attorney, the United States Marshal, the register and receiver of the United States land offices in the state, and each United States Commissioner residing in the state. The State Librarian shall determine whether the copies issued are in print or a reasonably available electronic format, upon recommendation by the Clerk of the Legislature and approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 7, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 3739;

C.S.1922, § 3132;

C.S.1929, § 49-507;

R.S.1943, § 49-507;

Laws 1987, LB 572, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 534, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 9.
July 18, 2026